Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 2. Control of Plats, Subdivisions, and Dedications.

Sec. 40.15.070.
Platting authority.

If land proposed to be subdivided or dedicated is situated within a municipality that has the power of land use regulation and that is exercising platting authority, the proposed subdivision or dedication shall be submitted to the municipal platting authority for approval. A subdivision may not be filed and recorded until it is approved by the platting authority.

The Department of Natural Resources is the platting authority in the areas of the state not described in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 (ch II) ch 115 SLA 1953; am § 68 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1971; am § 36 ch 161 SLA 1988; am §§ 7, 8 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For planning, platting, and zoning by municipalities, see AS 29.40.

Administrative Code. —

For identification, reservation, and modification of public easements, see 11 AAC 51, art. 2.

Sec. 40.15.075.
Authority in the unorganized borough and third class boroughs. [Repealed, § 12 ch 40 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 40.15.080,
40.15.090.
Procedure on plats; waiver. [Repealed, § 69 ch 69 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 40.15.100 — 40.15.180.
Information required; penalties; vacation and change of plats and streets. [Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]